dictsource/ha_rules
// replace
.replace
    c   ch

.group a
            a    a

.group b
	b	b

.group d
    d    d

.group e
    e    e

.group f
    f    f

.group g
    g    g

.group h
    h    h

.group i
    i    i

.group j
    j    j

.group k
    k    k

.group l
    l    l

.group m
    m    m

.group n
    n    n
    n)    C    N

.group o
    o    o

.group r
    r    r

.group s
    s    s

.group sh
    sh S

.group t
    t    t

.group ts
    ts    dz

.group u
    u    u

.group w
    w    w
.group y
    y    y

.group z
    z    z
